Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 11 Interstate Rail Passenger Network Compact

32-11-1.
Ratification, enactment, and entry of compact.

The interstate rail passenger network compact is ratified, enacted, and entered into by the State of Georgia with all other states joining the compact in the form substantially as this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-2.
Policy.

It is the policy of the states party to this compact to cooperate and share the administrative and financial responsibilities concerning the planning of an interstate rail passenger network system connecting major cities in Illinois, Indiana, Kentucky, Tennessee, Georgia, and Florida.
The participating states agree that a rail passenger system would provide a beneficial service and would be enhanced if operated across state lines.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-3.
Economic impact study.

The states of Illinois, Indiana, Kentucky, Tennessee, Georgia, and Florida (referred to in this chapter as “participating states”) agree, upon adoption of this compact by the respective states, to jointly conduct and participate in a rail passenger network financial and economic impact study. The study must do the following:

Carry forward research previously performed by the national railroad passenger corporation (Amtrak) (report issued December 1990) for purposes of evaluating a representative service schedule, train running times, and associated costs.

Include consideration of the following:

The purchase of railroad equipment by a participating state and the lease of the railroad equipment to Amtrak.

The recommendation that a member of the council serve on the Amtrak board of directors.

The periodic review of projected passenger traffic estimates.

Any other matter related to the financial and economic impact of a rail passenger network between the cities of Chicago, Illinois, and Jacksonville, Florida.

Information and data collected during the study under subsection (a) of this Code section that is requested by a participating state or a consulting firm representing a participating state or the compact may be made available to the state or firm. However, the information may not include matters not of public record or of a nature considered to be privileged and confidential unless the state providing the information agrees to waive the confidentiality.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-4.
Assistance by participating states.

The participating states agree to do the following:

Make available to each other and to a consulting firm representing a participating state or the compact assistance that is available, including personnel, equipment, office space, machinery, computers, engineering, and technical advice and services.

Provide financial assistance for the implementation of the feasibility study that is available.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-5.
Creation of advisory council; membership.

The interstate rail passenger advisory council (referred to in this compact as the “council”) is created.
The membership of the council consists of three individuals from each participating state.
The Governor, President of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of Representatives shall each appoint one member of the council.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-6.
Duties of council.

The council shall do the following:

Meet within 30 days after ratification of this agreement by at least two participating states.

Establish rules for the conduct of the council’s business, including the payment of the reasonable and necessary travel expenses of council members.

Coordinate all aspects of the rail passenger financial and economic impact study under Code Section 32-11-3.

Contract with persons, including institutions of higher education, for performance of any part of the study under Code Section 32-11-3.

Upon approval of the study, negotiate the proportionate share that each state will contribute toward the implementation and management of the proposed restoration of the interstate rail passenger system.

Make recommendations to each participating state legislature concerning the results of the study required by this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-7.
Effective date.

This compact becomes effective upon the adoption of the compact into law by at least two of the participating states. Thereafter, the compact becomes effective for another participating state upon the enactment of the compact by the state.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-8.
Repeal.

This compact continues in force with respect to a participating state and remains binding upon the state until six months after the state has given notice to each other participating state of the repeal of this chapter. The withdrawal may not be construed to relieve a participating state from an obligation incurred before the end of the state’s participation in the compact.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.

32-11-9.
Construction of compact.

This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the compact’s purposes.

The provisions of this compact are severable. If:

A phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the Constitution of a participating state or of the United States; or

The applicability of this compact to a government, an agency, a person, or a circumstance is held invalid,

the validity of the remainder of this compact and the compact’s applicability to any government, agency, person, or circumstance is not affected.

If this compact is held contrary to the Constitution of a participating state, the compact remains in effect for the remaining participating states and in effect for the state affected for all severable matters.

History.

Code 1981, §

32-11-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 419, § 1.